Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2942
Application to existing agreements or referrals.

(a) The Uniform Mediation Act governs a mediation pursuant to a referral or an agreement to mediate made on or after August 31, 2003.

(b) On or after January 1, 2004, the Uniform Mediation Act governs an agreement to mediate whenever made.

(c) The Uniform Mediation Act is intended to address issues of privilege and does not diminish any other mediation requirements of the statutes of Nebraska.

Laws 2003, LB 255, § 13.